Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 2

Select Committee on Children and Youth [Repealed]

3-15-201. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 2; 1993, ch. 216, §§ 1, 2, 9; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011. Acts 1987, ch. 348, §§ 2, 3, 5, 6; 1993, ch. 216, §§ 1, 2, 3, 5-9; 1997, ch. 518, § 1; 2000, ch. 823, §§ 1, 2, 4; 2004, ch. 498, § 1; 2008, ch. 884, § 1; 2009, ch. 487, § 1, repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

Former §3-15-203 (Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 4), concerning the advisory task force, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 216, § 4.

3-15-202. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 3; 1993, ch. 216, § 3; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

3-15-203. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 4; repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 216, § 4

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

Former §3-15-203 (Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 4), concerning the advisory task force, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 216, § 4.

3-15-204. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 5; 1993, ch. 216, § 5; 2000, ch. 823, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

3-15-205. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 6; 1993, ch. 216, § 6; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

3-15-206. [Repealed.]

Acts 1987, ch. 348, § 7; 1990, ch. 611, § 1; 1993, ch. 216, § 7; 2000, ch. 823, § 3; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

3-15-207. [Repealed.]

Acts 1990, ch. 1057, §§ 2, 3; 1993, ch. 216, § 8; 1997, ch. 518, § 1; 2000, ch. 823, § 4; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

3-15-208. [Repealed.]

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 183; 2000, ch. 823, § 2; 2004, ch. 498, § 1; 2008, ch. 884, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.

3-15-209. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 487, § 1; repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 1(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§3-15-201 —3-15-209 concerned the select committee on children and youth.